Utah statutes.
26-18-304.   Process and criteria for awarding grants and contracts.
(1)  The department shall establish rules in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, governing the application form,
process, and criteria it will use in awarding grants and contracts under this
chapter.
(2)  When awarding a primary care grant under Subsection 26-18-302(1)(a), the
department shall consider the extent to which the applicant:
(a)  demonstrates that the area or a population group to be served under the
application has a shortage of primary health care and that the services will
be located so that they will provide assistance to the greatest number of
persons residing in the area or included in the population group;
(b)  utilizes other sources of funding, including private funding, to provide
primary health care;
(c)  demonstrates the ability and expertise to serve traditionally medically
underserved populations including persons of limited English-speaking ability,
single heads of households, the elderly, persons with low incomes, and persons
with chronic diseases;
(d)  demonstrates that it will assume financial risk for a specified number of
medically underserved persons within its catchment area for a predetermined
level of care on a prepaid capitation basis; and
(e)  meets other criteria determined by the department.
(3)  When awarding a contract for community based services under Subsection
26-18-302(1)(b), the department shall:
(a)  consider the extent to which the applicant:
(i)  demonstrates that the area or a population group to be served under the
application is a medically underserved area or population and that the
services will be located so that they will provide assistance to the greatest
number of persons residing in the area or included in the population group;
(ii)  utilizes other sources of funding, including private funding, to provide
the services described in Subsection 26-18-302(1)(b);
(iii)  demonstrates the ability and expertise to serve traditionally medically
underserved populations including persons of limited English-speaking ability,
single heads of households, the elderly, persons with low incomes, and persons
with chronic diseases;
(iv)  meets other criteria determined by the department; and
(v)  demonstrates the ability to empirically measure and report the results of
all contract supported activities;
(b)  consider the extent to which the contract increases the applicant's
institutional capacity;
(c)  consult with the state's:
(i)  Medicaid program;
(ii)  Children's Health Insurance Program; and
(iii)  other assistance programs within the Department of Workforce Services
and the Department of Human Services; and
(d)  as funding permits, implement the community based service contract as a
pilot program for which the department shall enter into contracts for services
as follows:
(i)  two contracts in the amount of $50,000 each to be awarded to experienced
and established applicants; and
(ii)  three contracts in the amount of $30,000 each to be awarded to
applicants that:
(A)  are not as established or experienced as the applicants under Subsection
(3)(d)(i); or
(B)  represent smaller community based approaches than the applicants
described in Subsection (3)(d)(i).
(4)  Once a contract has been awarded under Subsection (3), the department
shall provide technical assistance to the contractee to familiarize the
contractee with public and private resources available to support wellness,
health promotion, and disease management.
